nl: Bouwmaterialen > Energie- en elektriciteitsbenodigdheden: Armaturen, rotors en stators; Ballasten en starters; Koolborstels; Zekeringpanelen; Installatieautomaat; Leidingen en dozen; Elektromotors; Opbouwcontactdozen en -beugels; Stekkerafdekking; Elektrische schakelaars; Elektrische bedrading; Accessoires voor verlengsnoeren; Verlengsnoeren; Generatoraccessoires; Generatoren; Thuisautomatisering; Telefoon- en netwerkaansluitingen; Voedingsconverters; Toestelcontactdozen; Spanningsomzetters; Stopcontacten en contactdozen; Zonne-energiekits; Zonnepanelen; Stroomregelaars en transformatoren; Afdekramen voor muurcontactdozen en -schakelaars; Plugin klokschakelaars en sensoren; Kroonstenen, lasdoppen en -klemmen; Kabelschoenen en -stekkers
th: ฮาร์ดแวร์ > อุปกรณ์ที่ใช้ไฟฟ้า: อาร์มาเจอร์ โรเตอร์ และสเตเตอร์; บัลลาสต์และสตาร์ตเตอร์; แปรงถ่าน; แผงตัวตัดวงจร; ตัวตัดวงจร; ท่อคอนดูทและกล่อง; มอเตอร์ไฟฟ้า; กล่องต่อสายและขายึดอุปกรณ์ไฟฟ้า; ฝาครอบปลั๊กไฟฟ้า; สวิตช์ไฟฟ้า; สายไฟและสายเคเบิล; อุปกรณ์สายพ่วงไฟ; ปลั๊กพ่วง; อุปกรณ์เครื่องกำเนิดไฟฟ้า; เครื่องกำเนิดไฟฟ้า; ชุดระบบอัตโนมัติในบ้าน; ช่องเสียบสายโทรศัพท์และอินเทอร์เน็ต; เครื่องแปลงกระแสไฟฟ้า; ปลั๊กไฟฟ้า; อุปกรณ์แปลงกระแสไฟฟ้าตรงเป็นกระแสไฟฟ้าสลับ; เต้ารับ; ชุดพลังงานแสงอาทิตย์; แผงเซลล์แสงอาทิตย์; ตัวแปลงและควบคุมแรงดันไฟฟ้า; เพลทและฝาบ็อกซ์ไฟ; อุปกรณ์ควบคุมและตรวจจับเต้ารับไฟฟ้า; ฝาครอบสายไฟ; เต๋าหรือตลับต่อและปิดสายไฟ
vi: Phần cứng > Nguồn & Cấp điện: Phần ứng điện, Rôto & Stato; Tăng phô và chuột đèn; Chổi than; Bảng cầu dao tự động; Cầu dao; Ống luồn dây điện và hộp điện; Mô tơ điện; Hộp & chân đế gắn ổ điện; Bịt ổ điện; Công tắc điện; Cáp và dây điện; Phụ kiện nối dài dây; Dây nối dài; Phụ kiện máy phát; Máy phát; Bộ điều khiển nhà thông minh; Giắc cắm điện thoại và kết nối dữ liệu; Bộ chuyển đổi điện; Ổ cắm lọc nguồn; Bộ đổi nguồn; Ổ cắm và phích cắm điện; Bộ pin năng lượng mặt trời; Tấm pin năng lượng mặt trời; Máy biến áp đo lường cao áp & bộ điều tiết điện thế; Vách chắn và nắp ốp tường cho công tắc/ổ cắm; Bộ cảm ứng và điều khiển ổ cắm điện gắn tường; Nắp cách điện và chụp dây điện; Đầu nối và đầu bắt dây
el: Υλικά κατασκευών > Παροχή ρεύματος & ηλεκτρικά εξαρτήματα: Οπλισμοί, ρότορες & στάτορες; Έρματα και εκκινητές; Ψήκτρες από άνθρακα; Πίνακες διακοπτών κυκλώματος; Διακόπτες κυκλώματος; Αγωγοί & περιβλήματα; Ηλεκτρικοί κινητήρες; Κουτιά & βάσεις τοποθέτησης ηλεκτρικών συσκευών; Καπάκια ηλεκτρικών βυσμάτων; Ηλεκτρικοί διακόπτες; Ηλεκτρικά σύρματα & καλώδια; Αξεσουάρ καλωδίου επέκτασης; Προεκτάσεις; Εξαρτήματα γεννητριών; Γεννήτριες; Κιτ οικιακού αυτοματισμού; Υποδοχές τηλεφώνου και δεδομένων; Μετατροπείς ισχύος; Είσοδοι ρεύματος; Αντιστροφείς ισχύος; Πρίζες και υποδοχές ρεύματος; Κιτ ηλιακής ενέργειας; Ηλιακοί συλλέκτες; Μετασχηματιστές & ρυθμιστές τάσης; Πλάκες & καλύμματα τοίχου; Έλεγχοι & αισθητήρες πρίζας τοίχου; Καπάκια & παξιμάδια καλωδίων; Ακροδέκτες & σύνδεσμοι καλωδίων
en: Hardware > Power & Electrical Supplies: Armatures, Rotors & Stators; Ballasts & Starters; Carbon Brushes; Circuit Breaker Panels; Circuit Breakers; Conduit & Housings; Electrical Motors; Electrical Mount Boxes & Brackets; Electrical Plug Caps; Electrical Switches; Electrical Wires & Cable; Extension Cord Accessories; Extension Cords; Generator Accessories; Generators; Home Automation Kits; Phone & Data Jacks; Power Converters; Power Inlets; Power Inverters; Power Outlets & Sockets; Solar Energy Kits; Solar Panels; Voltage Transformers & Regulators; Wall Plates & Covers; Wall Socket Controls & Sensors; Wire Caps & Nuts; Wire Terminals & Connectors
sk-SK: Náradie > Dodávka elektrickej energie: Armatúry, rotory a statory; Predradníky a štartéry; Uhlíkové kefy; Panely ističa; Ističe; Vedenie a kryty; Elektrické motory; Elektrické montážne boxy a konzoly; Záslepky do elektrických zástrčiek; Elektrické spínače; Elektrické vodiče a káble; Príslušenstvo k predlžovacím káblom; Predlžovacie káble; Príslušenstvo ku generátoru; Generátory; Súpravy domácej automatizácie; Telefónne a dátové konektory; Elektrické meniče; Prívody napájania; Elektrické invertory; Sieťové zásuvky a zástrčky; Súpravy solárnej energie; Solárne panely; Transformátory a regulátory napätia; Nástenné platničky a kryty; Ovládače a senzory nástenných zásuviek; Káblové koncovky a matice; Káblové terminály a konektory
it: Articoli di ferramenta > Forniture elettriche: Armature, rotori e statori; Resistenze e starter; Spazzole di carbonio; Pannelli per interruttori; Interruttori automatici; Tubi e alloggiamenti; Motori elettrici; Scatole di derivazione e staffe; Copriprese elettriche; Interruttori elettrici; Fili e cavi elettrici; Accessori per prolunghe; Prolunghe; Accessori generatori; Generatori; Kit per la domotica; Connettori telefono e dati; Convertitori di potenza; Prese di corrente; Invertitori di corrente; Prese elettriche; Kit fotovoltaici; Pannelli solari; Regolatori e trasformatori di tensione; Placche a muro e coperture; Controlli e sensori per prese; Tappi e dadi per cavi; Connettori e terminali cavo
lt-LT: Techninė įranga > Elektros reikmenys: Inkarai, rotoriai ir statoriai; Balastai ir starteriai; Angliniai šepetėliai; Grandinės pertraukiklių skydeliai; Grandinės pertraukikliai; Pravadiniai vamzdžiai ir korpusai; Elektros varikliai; Elektros įrangos montavimo dėžutės ir laikikliai; Elektros kištukų dangteliai; Elektriniai jungikliai; Elektros laidai ir kabeliai; Ilginimo laidų priedai; Ilginimo laidai; Generatorių priedai; Generatoriai; Namų automatikos rinkiniai; Telefono ir duomenų lizdai; Maitinimo keitikliai; Maitinimo įvadai; Maitinimo keitikliai; Maitinimo lizdai; Saulės energijos rinkiniai; Saulės baterijos; Įtampos transformatoriai ir reguliatoriai; Sieninės plokštelės ir dangteliai; Sieninių lizdų valdikliai ir jutikliai; Laidų dangteliai ir veržlės; Laidų gnybtai ir jungtys
es: Bricolaje > Suministros eléctricos: Armaduras, rotores y estatores; Balastos y arranques; Escobillas de carbono; Cuadros de distribución; Disyuntores; Conductos y carcasas; Motores eléctricos; Escuadras y cajas de montaje eléctricas; Protectores de enchufes; Interruptores eléctricos; Cables eléctricos; Accesorios para cables de extensión; Alargador eléctrico; Accesorios para generadores; Generadores; Kits de automatización doméstica; Rosetas; Conversores de potencia; Entradas de alimentación; Inversores de corriente; Enchufes de pared y tomacorrientes; Kits de energía solar; Paneles solares; Reguladores y transformadores de voltaje; Placas de pared; Controles y sensores eléctricos; Cubiertas protectoras y empalmes plásticos; Conectores y terminales de cables
pt-BR: Ferragens > Suprimentos elétricos: Armações, rotores e estatores; Reatores e starters; Escovas de carvão; Quadros de distribuição; Disjuntores; Conduítes e compartimentos; Motores elétricos; Caixas e braçadeiras de montagem; Protetores de tomadas; Interruptores elétricos; Fios e cabos elétricos; Acessórios para fios de extensão; Cabos extensores; Acessórios para gerador; Geradores; Kits de automação doméstica; Conectores fêmea para telefonia/dados; Conversores de potência; Tomadas; Transformadores de energia; Tomadas e soquetes; Kits de energia solar; Painéis solares; Reguladores e transformadores de tensão; Espelhos para tomadas e interruptores; Sensores e controles de soquete de parede; Tampas e cápsulas para fios; Conectores e terminais de cabos
ru: Оборудование и технические изделия > Системы электроснабжения: Якоря, роторы и статоры; Балласты и стартеры; Угольные щетки; Электрические распределительные щиты; Автоматические выключатели; Трубы для кабелей и термоусадочные трубки; Электродвигатели; Монтажные коробки и кронштейны для кабелей; Колпачки для электрических вилок; Электровыключатели; Электрические провода и кабели; Аксессуары для удлинителей; Удлинители; Аксессуары для генераторов; Генераторы; Наборы для бытовой автоматизации; Телефонные и сетевые разъемы; Преобразователи мощности; Разъемы питания; Преобразователи напряжения; Электрические розетки; Наборы для солнечного электроснабжения; Солнечные панели; Трансформаторы и стабилизаторы напряжения; Рамки и крышки для розеток и выключателей; Таймеры и датчики для розеток; Обжимные колпачки и соединительные изолирующие зажимы; Гильзы и наконечники для проводов
cs: Kutilství a řemeslo > Elektroinstalace: Armatury, rotory a statory; Předřadníky a startéry; Uhlíkové kartáčky; Rozvaděče; Jističe; Vedení kabelů a kryty; Elektromotory; Elektroinstalační krabice a konzoly; Záslepky do zásuvek; Elektrické spínače; Elektrické dráty a kabely; Prodlužovací kabely – příslušenství; Prodlužovací kabely; Generátory – příslušenství; Generátory; Sady pro automatizaci domácnosti; Telefonní a síťové konektory; Měniče napětí; Napájecí zásuvky; Měniče DC-AC; Elektrické zásuvky; Sady solárních panelů; Solární panely; Transformátory a regulátory napětí; Elektroinstalační nástěnné rámečky a kryty; Ovladače a senzory do elektrické zásuvky; Spojovací čepičky na kabely; Koncovky a konektory
ro-RO: Feronerie > Articole și consumabile de alimentare și electrice: Armături, rotoare și statoare; Balasturi și demaroare; Perii de cărbune; Panouri întrerupătoare; Întrerupătoare de circuit; Conducte și carcase; Motoare electrice; Cutii și console pentru cutii de derivație; Capace pentru prize electrice; Întrerupătoare electrice; Cabluri și fire electrice; Accesorii prelungitoare; Prelungitoare; Accesorii generatoare; Generatoare; Seturi automatizare locuință; Mufe pentru telefon și date; Convertoare de putere; Prize de alimentare; Invertoare de putere; Prize; Seturi energie solară; Panouri solare; Transformatoare și regulatoare de tensiune; Plăci și capace de perete; Comenzi și senzori pentru prize de perete; Capace și piulițe pentru cabluri; Borne și conectori pentru cabluri
nb: Maskinvare > Strøm- og elektrisk utstyr: Armaturer, rotorer og statorer; Ballaster og startere; Karbonbørster; Sikringspaneler; Strømbrytere; Ledninger og hus; Elektromotorer; Elektriske monteringsbokser og -braketter; Elektriske plugghetter; Elektriske brytere; Elektriske ledninger og kabler; Tilbehør til forlengerledninger; Forlengerledninger; Generatortilbehør; Generatorer; Sett for hjemmeautomasjon; Telefon- og datakontakter; Strømkonvertere; Strøminnganger; Strøminvertere; Strømuttak og -kontakter; Sett for solenergi; Solpaneler; Spenningstransformatorer og regulatorer; Veggplater og -deksler; Kontroller og sensorer for stikkontakter; Ledningshetter og -muttere; Ledningsterminaler og -tilkoblinger
sv: Metallprodukter > Eltillbehör: Armaturer, rotorer och statorer; Förkopplingsdon och startanordningar; Kolborstar; Säkringsskåp; Effektbrytare; Ledningar och höljen; Elmotorer; Monteringsboxar och fästen; Skyddsproppar för eluttag; Elektriska brytare; Elkablar; Tillbehör till förlängningskablar; Förlängningskablar; Generatortillbehör; Generatorer; Hemautomatisering; Keystoneuttag; Strömkonverterare; Elintag; Växelriktare; Kraftuttag; Solenergipaket; Solcellspaneler; Spänningstransformatorer och -regulatorer; Täckramar; Elektriska timers; Sladdproppar och Wire-Nuts; Trådklämmor och -förbindare
hu: Hardver > Tápellátás és elektromos kellékek: Armatúrák, rotorok és állórészek; Ballasztok és indítók; Szénkefék; Áramköri megszakítópanelek; Áramköri megszakítók; Vezetékek és házak; Elektromos motorok; Elektromos szerelődobozok és konzolok; Elektromos csatlakozósapkák; Elektromos kapcsolók; Elektromos vezetékek és kábelek; Hosszabbítókábel-kiegészítők; Hosszabbító kábelek; Generátorkiegészítők; Generátorok; Otthonautomatizálási készletek; Telefon- és adatcsatlakozók; Teljesítményátalakítók; Tápbemenetek; Tápinverterek; Konnektorok és aljzatok; Napenergia-készletek; Napelemek; Feszültségtranszformátorok és -szabályozók; Fali lemezek és burkolatok; Fali aljzatvezérlők és érzékelők; Drótsapkák és anyák; Drótkivezetések és csatlakozók
pt-PT: Equipamento > Artigos de potência e alimentação elétrica: Armaduras, rotores e estatores; Balastros e arrancadores; Escovas de carvão; Painéis de disjuntor; Disjuntores; Condutores e alojamentos; Motores elétricos; Caixas e suportes de montagem elétrica; Tampas de bujões elétricos; Interruptores elétricos; Fios e cabos elétricos; Acessórios de cabos de extensão; Cabos de extensão; Acessórios de gerador; Geradores; Kits de automatização domésticos; Tomadas de telefone e de dados; Conversores de potência; Entradas de potência; Inversores de potência; Tomadas e saídas de potência; Kits de energia solar; Painéis solares; Transformadores e reguladores de voltagem; Tampas e placas de parede; Controlos e sensores de tomada de parede; Tampas e porcas de fios; Terminais e conectores de fio
fr: Quincaillerie > Accessoires électriques: Armatures, rotors et stators; Ballasts et démarreurs; Brosses à charbon; Tableaux électriques; Disjoncteurs; Tuyaux et gaines; Moteurs électriques; Boîtiers de fixation électriques; Cache-prises électriques; Interrupteurs; Fils et câbles électriques; Accessoires pour rallonges; Rallonges électriques; Accessoires pour générateurs; Générateurs; Kits de domotique; Connecteurs téléphone et réseau; Convertisseurs électriques; Prises de courant mâles; Onduleurs; Prises de courant; Kits d’énergie solaire; Panneaux solaires; Transformateurs et régulateurs de tension; Plaques murales; Commandes de prises murales et capteurs électriques; Capuchons de connexion; Bornes et connecteurs de fils électriques
bg-BG: Железария > Захранване и електрически консумативи: Котви, ротори и статори; Баласти и стартери; Карбонови четки; Панели за електрически прекъсвач; Електрически прекъсвач; Тръби за кабели и корпуси; Електрически двигатели; Електрически монтажни кутии и скоби; Капачки за електрически контакти; Електрически ключове; Електрически проводници и кабели; Аксесоари за удължителен кабел; Удължителни кабели; Аксесоари за генератор; Генератори; Комплекти за домашна автоматизация; Жакове за телефон и данни; Конвертори на напрежение; Конектори за захранване; Инвертори на захранване; Щепселни кутии и контакти; Комплекти за слънчева енергия; Соларни панели; Трансформатори и регулатори на напрежение; Рамки и капаци за стенни ключове и контакти; Управление и сензори за стенни контакти; Кабелни клеми; Кабелни обувки и конектори
sl-SI: Gradbena oprema > Napajanje in električna oprema: Armature, rotorji in statorji; Dušilke in zaganjalniki; Ogljikove ščetke; Plošče za odklopnike; Odklopniki; Vodi in ohišja; Električni motorji; Električne montažne omarice in nosilci; Pokrovčki za električne vtiče; Električna stikala; Električne žice in kabli; Dodatki za podaljške; Podaljški; Dodatki za generatorje; Generatorji; Kompleti za pametni dom; Telefonske in podatkovne vtičnice; Pretvorniki napetosti; Električni priključki; Električni pretvorniki; Električne vtičnice in vtiči; Kompleti za sončno energijo; Sončni paneli; Transformatorji in regulatorji napetosti; Stenske plošče in pokrovi; Krmilniki in senzorji za stenske vtičnice; Žične kapice in matice; Žične sponke in priključki
hr-HR: Željezarija > Elektroinstalacijska oprema: Armature, rotori i statori; Balasti i pokretači; Karbonske četke; Ploče prekidača; Prekidači; Vodovi i kućišta; Elektromotori; Razvodne kutije i nosači; Poklopci za električne utikače; Električni prekidači; Električne žice i kabeli; Pribor za produžne kabele; Produžne žice; Pribor za generatore; Generatori; Kompleti za automatizaciju kućanstva; Telefonski i podatkovni priključci; Pretvarači napona; Ulazi za napajanje; Inverteri napona; Utičnice; Kompleti za solarnu energiju; Solarne ploče; Transformatori i regulatori napona; Zidne ploče i pokrovi; Kontrole i senzori za zidne utičnice; Kapice i matice za žice; Žičani terminali i konektori
fi: Rakentaminen > Teholähteet ja sähkötarvikkeet: Armatuurit, roottorit ja staattorit; Elektroniset liitäntälaitteet ja sytyttimet; Hiiliharjat; Sähkötaulut; Katkaisijat; Sähköputket ja kotelot; Sähkömoottorit; Sähköasennusrasiat ja -kotelot; Pistorasian suojatulpat; Sähkökatkaisijat; Sähköjohdot ja -kaapelit; Jatkojohtotarvikkeet; Jatkojohdot; Generaattoreiden tarvikkeet; Generaattorit; Kodin automaatiosetit; Puhelin- ja tiedonsiirtokaapelit; Virtamuuntimet; Pistokkeet; Vaihtosuuntaajat; Pistorasiat; Aurinkoenergiasetit; Aurinkopaneelit; Jännitemuuntajat ja -säätimet; Peitelevyt; Pistorasian hallintalaitteet ja anturit; Kaapelikorkit ja -pultit; Johtojen rengas- ja kaapeliliittimet
tr: Hırdavat > Elektrik Sarf Malzemeleri: Armatürler, Rotorlar ve Statörler; Ayar Rezistansları ve Starterler; Kömür Fırçaları; Devre Kesici Paneller; Devre Kesiciler; Oluk ve Muhafazalar; Elektrik Motorları; Elektrikli Montaj Kutuları ve Braketleri; Priz Kapatıcılar; Elektrik Anahtarları; Elektrik Kabloları; Uzatma Kablosu Aksesuarları; Uzatma Kabloları; Jeneratör Aksesuarları; Jeneratörler; Ev Otomasyonu Setleri; Telefon ve Veri Jakları; Güç Dönüştürücüler; Elektrik Girişleri; Güç Çeviriciler; Prizler ve Soketler; Güneş Enerjisi Kitleri; Güneş Enerjisi Panelleri; Gerilim Transformatörleri ve Regülatörleri; Duvar Plakaları ve Kaplamaları; Priz Kumandaları ve Sensörleri; Kablo Başlıkları ve Somunları; Kablo Sonlandırıcılar ve Konektörler
da: Isenkram > Eludstyr: Induktorer, rotorer og statorer; Ballast og startere; Kulkontakter; Afbryderpaneler; Afbrydere; Ledninger og huse; Elektriske motorer; Monteringsbokse og beslag; Stikkontaktbeskytter; Kontakter; Elledninger; Forlængerledning – tilbehør; Forlængerledninger; Generator – tilbehør; Generatorer; Central styring af hjemmet; Telefon- og datastik; Strøm – omformere; Strømstik; Strøm – vekselrettere; Stikdåser; Solenergisæt; Solpaneler; Spændingstransformatorer og spændingsregulatorer; Afdækninger til elektriske kontakter; Elektriske timere og sensorer; Kabelhætter - og møtrikker; Forbindelsesklemmer
ko: 철물 > 전원/전기 용품: 전기자/회전자/고정자; 안정기/스타터; 탄소 브러시; 회로 차단기 패널; 회로 차단기; 도관/하우징; 전기 모터; 전자기기 마운트 박스/브래킷; 전기 플러그 덮개; 전기 스위치; 전선/케이블; 연장 전선 부대용품; 연장 전선; 발전기 부대용품; 발전기; 스마트 홈 키트; 전화/데이터 잭; 전력 변환 장치; 전원 인입구; 전력 역변환 장치; 전원 콘센트/소켓; 태양광 세트; 태양 전지판; 변압기/전압 조정기; 월플레이트/월플레이트 커버; 콘센트 제어 장치/센서; 전선 캡/너트; 전선 단자/접속자
de: Heimwerkerbedarf > Elektrobedarf: Anker, Rotoren und Statoren; Vorschaltgeräte & Starter; Kohlebürsten; Verteilerkästen; Leistungsschalter; Leitungen & Gehäuse; Elektromotoren; Anschlussdosen & Halterungen; Steckdosenabdeckungen; Elektroschalter; Elektrische Leitungen; Verlängerungskabelzubehör; Verlängerungskabel; Zubehör für Generatoren; Generatoren; Heim- & Gebäudeautomatisierung; Telefon- & Internetbuchsen; Schaltnetzteile; Gerätestecker; Wechselrichter; Steckdosen; Solarenergie-Kits; Solarpaneele; Spannungswandler & -regler; Wandplatten; Steckdosen-Zeitschaltuhren & -Sensoren; Drahtbindemaschinen; Kabelanschlüsse & Steckverbinder
ja: DIY用品 > 電力供給装置: アーマチャー、ローター、ステーター; バラスト・スターター; カーボンブラシ; ブレーカーパネル; サーキットブレーカー; コンジット・ハウジング; 電気モーター; マウントボックス・ブラケット; コンセントキャップ; 電気スイッチ; 電線; 延長コード関連用品; 延長コード; 発電機関連用品; 発電機; ホームオートメーション; キーストンジャック; AC-DCコンバーター; 電源インレット; DC-ACインバーター; コンセント; 太陽光発電システム; ソーラーパネル; 変圧器・調整器; スイッチ・コンセントプレート; 電気タイマー; ワイヤーキャップ・ナット; ケーブル端子・コネクター
pl: Sprzęt > Materiały elektryczne: Wirniki i stojany; Dławiki i startery; Szczotki węglowe; Tablice bezpiecznikowe; Bezpieczniki elektryczne; Osłony i izolacje kabli; Silniki elektryczne; Skrzynki montażowe i uchwyty; Zabezpieczenia do kontaktów; Przełączniki elektryczne; Kable i przewody elektryczne; Akcesoria do przedłużaczy; Przedłużacze; Akcesoria do agregatów prądotwórczych; Agregaty prądotwórcze; Automatyka domowa; Gniazda keystone; Przetwornice napięcia; Wtyczki elektryczne; Falowniki; Gniazdka ścienne; Zestawy do instalacji słonecznych; Panele słoneczne; Transformatory i regulatory napięcia; Płyty ścienne; Kontrolki i sensory do gniazdek; Końcówki kablowe; Końcówki, zaciski i złączki
zh-TW: 硬體 > 供電用品: 電樞、轉子和定子; 電燈啟動器; 碳刷; 斷路器面板; 斷路器; 電線導管和外殼; 電動馬達; 壁掛變電箱/變電組; 插座蓋; 電動開關; 電線; 延長線配件; 延長線; 發電器配件; 發電機; 家庭自動化套件; 電話和網路插孔; 電源轉換器; 輸電插座; 逆變器; 電源插座; 太陽能套件; 太陽能板; 變壓器/調壓器; 插座蓋板; 壁掛式插座控制組和感應器; 閉端端子; 電線接頭端子和連接器
zh-CN: 五金/硬件 > 电动/电气用品: 电枢、转子与定子; 镇流器/启辉器; 碳刷; 断路器柜; 断路器; 导管/外壳; 电动马达; 电气安装盒/支架; 电器插头保护盖; 电开关; 电线/电缆; 插排/电源延长线配件; 延长线/接线板; 发电机配件; 发电机; 家居自动化套装; 电话/网线插座; 交流-直流转换器; 电源输入装置; 逆变器; 插座/墙插; 太阳能组件; 太阳能光伏板; 电压互感器/稳压器; 壁装插座板/开关面板; 墙装插座控制器/感应器; 接线帽; 接线端子和电线连接头